Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2102
Abusive head trauma; legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that abusive head trauma may occur when an infant or child is violently shaken as part of a pattern of abuse or because an adult has momentarily succumbed to the frustration of responding to a crying infant or child. The Legislature further finds that the injuries sustained by the infant or child can include brain swelling and damage, subdural hemorrhage, intellectual disability, or death. The Legislature further finds and declares that there is a present and growing need to provide programs aimed at reducing the number of cases of abusive head trauma in infants and children in Nebraska.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 148;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 33;

Laws 2019, LB60, § 2.